District of Columbia statutes.
16-4402

Notice.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a person gives notice to another person by taking action that is reasonably necessary to inform the other person in ordinary course, whether or not the other person acquires knowledge of the notice.

(b)

A person has notice if the person has knowledge of the notice or has received notice.

(c)

A person receives notice when it comes to the person’s attention or the notice is delivered at the person’s place of residence or place of business, or at another location held out by the person as a place of delivery of such communications.

History

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-111, § 2(b), 55 DCR 1847

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2 of the Uniform Arbitration Act (2000).